src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k22_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: himmal
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: himmal
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: himli
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: himmals
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: himlar
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: himlar
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: himlum
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: himla
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: himmalin
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: himmalin
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [himlinum, himmalinum]
    himmal+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: himmalsins
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: himlarnir
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: himlarnar
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: himlunum
    himmal+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: himlanna
